hu: Támogatott videokodekek/-formátumok: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Egyéb
da: Understøttede video-codecs/formater: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 del 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Andet
pl: Obsługiwane kodeki/formaty wideo: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264; H.264B; H.265; H.265; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; STG; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Palaikomi vaizdo kodekai / formatai: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO („Blu-ray“); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; „Quicktime“; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; „WebM“; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Kita
it: Codec/formati video supportati: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Altro
vi: Các codec/định dạnh video được hỗ trợ: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Khác
hr-HR: Podržani videokodeci/videoformati: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Ostalo
pt-BR: Codecs/formatos de vídeo com suporte: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 Parte 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Outro
nb: Støttede kodeker/formater: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 del 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Annen
de: Unterstützte Video-Codecs/-Formate: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Teil 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Podporované video kodeky/formáty: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 časť 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Iné
sl-SI: Podprti video kodeki/formati: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Drugo
ro-RO: Codecuri/formate audio acceptate: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Altele
tr: Desteklenen Video Codec'leri/Formatları: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DivX3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Diğer
zh-TW: 支援的影音編解碼器/格式: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (藍光); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 第 2 部分; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; 其他
fi: Tuetut videokoodekit/-formaatit: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Muu
fr: Codecs/formats vidéo pris en charge: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Partie 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; QuickTime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Autre
pt-PT: Codecs/formatos de vídeo suportados: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 Parte 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Outro
en: Video codecs/formats supported: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Other
bg-BG: Поддържани видео кодеци/формати: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Други
es: Códecs o formatos de video compatibles: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Otros
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι κωδικοποιητές/μορφές βίντεο: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Άλλο
ja: 対応ビデオコーデック/フォーマット: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (ブルーレイ); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 パート2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; QuickTime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; その他
sv: Kompatibla videokodekar/-format: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 del 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Annat
ko: 지원되는 비디오 코덱/형식: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO(블루레이); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG-4 파트 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; 기타
cs: Podporované videokodeky/videoformáty: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Jiné
nl: Ondersteunde videocodecs/formaten: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; Andere
th: รองรับตัวแปลงสัญญาณวิดีโอ/รูปแบบ: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX HD; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; อื่นๆ
ru: Поддерживаемые видеокодеки/форматы: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DivX; DivX HD; DivX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO (Blu-ray); M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WebM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; Xvid; YUV; YUY2; Другой
zh-CN: 支持的视频编解码器/格式: 3G2; 3GP; 3GPP; AMV; ASF; ASP; AVC; AVCHD; AVI; AVS; AVS+; BDMV; DAT; DIV X3; DV; DVR-MS; DIVX; DIVX 高清; DIVX WEBM; FLV; H.239; H.261; H.262; H.263; H.263+; H.264; H.264 BP; H.264+; H.264B; H.265; H.265+; HEVC; HEVC/H.265; IFO; INSV; ISO; ISO（蓝光）; M-JPEG; M2P; M2T; M2TS; M4V; MJPG; MKV; MOD; MOV; MP4; MP43; MPEG; MPEG1; MPEG2; MPEG2-PS; MPEG2-TS; MPEG21; MPEG4; MPEG4-ASP; MPEG4-SP; MPEG7; MPEG‑4 Part 2; MPG; MPO; MTS; MTV; MVC; MXF; MXV; MxPEG; NV12; OGM; PMP; PRKL; PS; ProRes; QTFF; Quicktime; RAW; RM; RMVB; RV; RV30; RV40; SHVC; SMV; SVAF; SVI; SWF; Sorenson H.263; TP; TRP; TS; TS4; VC-1; VMW7; VOB; VP6; VP8; VP9; VRO; WM-DRM; WMA; WMA Pro; WMV; WMV10; WMV3; WMV7; WMV8; WMV9; WMV9 HD; WEBM; XAVC; XAVC HS; XAVC S; XAVC-I; XF-AVC; XVID; YUV; YUY2; 其他